src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON GALLE !!≈ * **@CODE@** Case forms of galle
 +Sg+Nom:e K ;
 +Sg+Acc:e K ;
 +Sg+Gen:i%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:e%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Loc:i%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:i%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:i%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Attr:i%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;
 +Sg+Com:i%>X5jn K ;
 +Ess:i%>n K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:e%>n K ;
 +Pl+Nom:i%>X4t K ;
 +Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd RHyph ;
 +Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON MANGA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Case forms of máŋga
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Ess:%>n K ;
 +Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
! +Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>X5jd RHyph ;
 +Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;


LEXICON oblindefcasge-mihkkege
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:idege # ;
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:nge# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:sage # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:sge # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG:stege # ;
+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:jnnage # ;
+Ess+Foc/Neg-ge:ninge # ;
+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:htte%>ge # ;
+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:hkke%>ge # ;
!+Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:ide%>ge # ;
+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:idge # ;
+Pl+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:jddage # ;
+Pl+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:jnge # ;
!Here we do not go to the case paradigm of the demonstratives,
!since the clitic path is different. ComPl lacks (intentionally) from paradigm.
!The other cases, then pointing to clitics


LEXICON oblindefcasge-mihkkige
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:idige # ;
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:nge# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:sage # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:sge # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG:stige # ;
+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:jnnage # ;
+Ess+Foc/Neg-ge:ninge # ;
+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:htti%>ge # ;
+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:hkki%>ge # ;
!+Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:idi%>ge # ;
+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:idge # ;
+Pl+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:jddage # ;
+Pl+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:jnge # ;
!Here we do not go to the case paradigm of the demonstratives,
!since the clitic path is different. ComPl lacks (intentionally) from paradigm.
!The other cases, then pointing to clitics

LEXICON oblindefcasge
+Sg: oblindemcassgge ;
+Pl: oblindemcasplge ;
   oblindemcasessge ;


LEXICON oblindefcas
+Pl:0 oblindemcaspl ;

LEXICON oblindemcasplge
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG:jdige # ;  !Trenger vi disse?
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jdige# NAMAT ;
!+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG:jdige # ;  !Trenger vi disse?
+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:idge # ;
+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:jddage # ;
+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:jnge # ;
!Here we do not go to the case paradigm of the demonstratives,
!since the clitic path is different. ComPl lacks (intentionally) from paradigm.

LEXICON oblindemcassgge
!The other cases, then pointing to clitics
+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:nge# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:nge # ;
+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:sage # ;
+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:sge # ;
+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/NG:stege # ;
+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:jnnage # ;

LEXICON oblindemcasessge
+Ess+Foc/Neg-ge:ninge # ;

LEXICON oblindemcaspl
+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:jde # ;
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:jde# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:jde # ;
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:jdege # ;   !Trenger vi disse?
!+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:jdege# NAMAT ;


LEXICON oblindefcas-giinai
+Gen:nnai # ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:nnai# NAMAT ;
+Acc:nnai # ;
+Gen+Use/NG:nai # ;
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:nai# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:nai # ;
+Ill:sanai # ;
+Ill+Use/NG:sai # ;
+Loc:snai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:sai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:stenai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:stai # ;
+Com:jnnanai # ;
+Com+Use/NG:jnnai # ;
+Gen+Use/NG:jdnai # ;
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jdnai# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:jdnai # ;
+Gen+Use/NG:jdai # ;
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jdai# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:jdai # ;
+Ill+Use/NG:jddanai # ;
+Ill+Use/NG:jddai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:jnnai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:jnai # ;

LEXICON oblindefcas-miinai
+Gen:nnai # ;
!+Gen+Use/-Spell:nnai# NAMAT ;
+Acc:nnai # ;
! +Gen:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:nai# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:nai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
+Ill:sanai # ;
+Ill+Use/NG:sai # ;
+Loc:snai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:sai # ;
+Loc:stenai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:stai # ;
+Com:jnnanai # ;
+Com+Use/NG:jnnai # ;
+Gen+Use/NG:jdnai # ;
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jdnai# NAMAT ;
+Acc+Use/NG:jdnai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
! +Gen:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
!+Gen+Use/NG+Use/-Spell:jdai# NAMAT ;
! +Acc:jdai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
+Ill+Use/NG:jddanai # ;
! +Ill:jddai # ; !commented out disamb reasons
+Loc+Use/NG:jnnai # ;
+Loc+Use/NG:jnai # ;




! guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGECASE
GUHTEGE-NE ;
GUHTEGE-OBL ;


! Nom and Ess of guhtege
LEXICON GUHTEGE-NE
+Sg+Nom: K-ge-only ;
+Attr: K-ge-only ;
+Ess:%>n K-ge-only ;

! guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGECASE
GUHTEMUSGE-NE ;
:a%> GUHTEMUSGE-OBL ;

! Nom and Ess of guhtemušge
LEXICON GUHTEMUSGE-NE
+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:%>ge # ;
+Ess+Foc/Neg-ge:a%>nge # ;

LEXICON GUHTEGE-OBL
+Sg+Gen:X8 K-ge-only ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:X8 K-ge-only ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:X8 K-ge-only ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X8ge# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:X8 K-ge-only ;
+Sg+Ill:X3j K-ge-only ;
!+Sg+Gen: K-ge-only ; ! this should go out
+Sg+Loc:X4s K-ge-only ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K-ge-only ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X5jn K-ge-only ;
+Pl+Nom:X4t K-ge-only ;
+Pl+Gen:X5jd K-ge-only ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:X5jdge# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:X5jd K-ge-only ;
+Pl+Ill:X5jde K-ge-only ;
+Pl+Loc:X5jn K-ge-only ;
!+Pl+Com:X5jgujnge # ; !ComPl is out.

LEXICON GUHTEMUSGE-OBL
+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:X8ge # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:X8ge# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:X8ge # ;
+Sg+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:X3jge # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:ge # ; ! this should go out
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:X4sge # ;
+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge+South+Err/Orth:X4nge K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jnge # ;
+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge:X4tge # ;
+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jdge # ;
!+Pl+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge+Use/-Spell:X5jdge# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jdge # ;
+Pl+Ill+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jdege # ;
+Pl+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jnge # ;
!+Pl+Com+Foc/Neg-ge:X5jgujnge # ; !ComPl is out.

LEXICON GUHTENAI
+Sg+Nom:%>nai # ;
+Attr:%>nai # ;
+Sg+Gen:%>X8nai # ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X8nai # ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X8nai # ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X8nai# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:%>X8nai # ;
+Sg+Ill:%>X3jnai # ;
+Sg+Loc:%>X4snai # ;
+Sg+Com:%>X5jnnai # ;
+Ess:%>nnai # ;
+Pl+Nom:X4tnai # ;
+Pl+Gen:%>X5jdnai # ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>X5jdnai# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:%>X5jdnai # ;
+Pl+Ill:%>X5jdenai # ;
+Pl+Loc:%>X5jnnai # ;













! Declineable indefinites with normal case paradigms
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -













! Declension lexica for the declineable indefinites
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

!splitting v- and c-final evensyll in two for NomEss, as usual.
LEXICON indef-a-even-v
indefattr ;
indefdecleven-v-ne ;
indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indef-a-even-c
:%> indefattr ;
:%> indefdecleven-c-ne ;
:a%> indefdecleven-obl ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-obl
indefdeclsgeven ;
indefdeclpleven ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-v-ne
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Ess:n K ;

LEXICON indefdecleven-c-ne
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Ess:an K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsgeven
+Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X4# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X5jn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpleven
+Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON nubbicase
+Attr:0 K ;
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:X4 K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:X4 K ;
+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X4X7 K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X4X7# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X4X7 K ;
+Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X5js K ;
+Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON JUOBBA
+Sg+Nom: K ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:X4 K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:X4# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
+Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
+Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:X5jn K ;
+Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
+Pl+Gen:X5jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:X5jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:X5jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;


LEXICON JUOBBAGOABBA
+Sg+Nom:juobbá#goabbá K ;
+Sg+Gen:juoppá#goappá K ;
+Sg+Ill+Attr:juoppá#goappá K ;
+Sg+Loc+Attr:juoppá#goappá K ;
!+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:juoppá#goappá# NAMAT ;
+Sg+Acc:juoppá#goappá K ;
+Sg+Ill:juobbá%>i#goabbá%>i K ;
+Sg+Loc:juoppá%>s#goappá%>s K ;
+Sg+Com:juoppá%>in#goappá%>in K ;
+Ess:juobbá%>n#goabbá%>n K ;
+Pl+Nom:juobbá%>t#goabbá%>t K ;
+Pl+Gen:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Gen+Use/-Spell:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9# NAMAT ;
+Pl+Acc:juoppá%>jd9#goappá%>jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:juobbá%>jde#goabbá%>jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:juoppá%>jn#goappá%>jn K ;
+Pl+Com:juoppá%>jgujn#goappá%>jgujn K ;

! Intermediate lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indef-a-uneven
indefattr ;
indefdecluneven ;

!LEXICON indef-u-uneven ! eanet
!+Attr:t K ;
!+Sg+Nom:t K ;
!+Sg+Gen:bu K ;
!+Sg+Acc:bu K ;
!+Sg+Ill:buj K ;
!+Sg+Loc:bus K ;
!+Sg+Com:bujn K ;
!+Pl+Nom:ut K ;
!:bu indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
!+Ess:bun K ;


LEXICON indef-a-uneven-gahpir
indefattr ;
indefdecluneven-gahpir ;

LEXICON indefsg-a-uneven
indefattr ;
indu-sg ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven
indu-sg ;
indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg
:X4 indef-sg-u-n ;
indef-sg-u-e ;
:X2 indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indefdecluneven-gahpir
indu-sg-gahpir ;
indu-pl-gahpir ;

LEXICON indu-sg-gahpir
indefdeclsguneven-ne ;
indefdeclsguneven-ag ;
indefdeclsguneven-ilc ;

LEXICON indu-pl-gahpir
indefdeclpluneven-n ;
:i indefdeclpluneven-obl ;
indef-sg-u-e ; !For eatnagin

LEXICON indu-pl-goappas
indefdeclpluneven-n ;
:i indefdeclplunevengoappas-obl ;
indef-sg-u-e ; !For eatnagin


! Suffix lexica for uneven indefinite pronouns
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ne
indef-sg-u-n ;
indef-sg-u-e ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-n
+Sg+Nom: K ;

LEXICON indef-sg-u-e
+Ess:in K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ag
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Sg+Acc:a K ;

LEXICON indefdeclsguneven-ilc
+Sg+Ill:ij K ;
+Sg+Loc:is K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:in K ; ! !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:ijn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-n
+Pl+Nom:at K ;

LEXICON indefdeclpluneven-obl
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Ill+Attr:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Loc+Attr:jd9 K ;
!+Pl+Com+Attr:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON indefdeclplunevengoappas-obl
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill+Attr:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Loc+Attr:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Com+Attr:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;
